Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1983.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Indigenous Peoples' Day Act.Section 2. Legislative findings.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Millions of indigenous people inhabited the land that makes up this Commonwealth prior to European settlement.(2) The Doctrine of Discovery enabled Christian explorers to wrongfully seize lands inhabited by indigenous people and subjected indigenous people to brutality.(3) European exploration and settlement adversely impacted indigenous populations, devastated natural resources and initiated the slave trade.(4) Indigenous people suffered discrimination and 123456789101112131415161718 oppression as a result of European exploration and settlement.(5) This Commonwealth exists on the tribal lands of the Erie, Haudenosaunee, Lenape, Munsee, Shawnee and Susquehannock.(6) The Treaty of Shackamaxon between William Penn and the Lenape sought to cultivate an alliance and friendship.(7) The Treaty of Shackamaxon was broken within a generation.(8) From the early 19th through the mid-20th centuries, indigenous children were taken from their homes and sent to Indian Residential Schools, such as the Carlisle Indian Industrial School, which perpetuated cultural genocide of indigenous youth through forced "Americanization" that included the abandonment of language, tradition, names and identities.(9) The Snyder Act of 1924, which gave indigenous peoples born in the United States full citizenship, was an important step in guaranteeing the right to vote for indigenous people.(10) It is vital to honor the sacrifice, culture, tradition and contributions of the indigenous people of this Commonwealth and of North America.(11) We must build and strengthen connections with the communities and tribes of indigenous people in this Commonwealth.Section 3. Designation.The second Monday in October each year is designated as Indigenous Peoples' Day in this Commonwealth.Section 4. Construction.20250HB1983PN2502 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Nothing in this act shall be construed as requiring an employer to treat the second Monday in October as a legal or official holiday or to provide paid leave to an employee on the second Monday in October solely by virtue of the date being designated under this act.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1983PN2502 - 3 - 1234567